Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.090

Execution and form of letters testamentary.

Letters testamentary to be issued to executors under the provisions of this chapter shall be signed by the clerk, and issued under the seal of the court, and may be in the following form:

State of Washington, county of . . . . . .

In the superior court of the county of . . . . . .

Whereas, the last will of A B, deceased, was, on the . . . . day of . . . . . . , A.D. (year) . . . ., duly exhibited, proven, and recorded in our said superior court; and whereas, it appears in and by said will that C D is appointed executor thereon, and, whereas, said C D has duly qualified, now, therefore, know all persons by these presents, that we do hereby authorize the said C D to execute said will according to law.

Witness my hand and the seal of said court this . . . . day of . . . . . ., A.D. (year) . . . .

[ 2016 c 202 s 6; 2009 c 549 s 1004; 1965 c 145 s 11.28.090. Prior: (i) 1917 c 156 s 56; RCW 11.28.080; RRS s 1426; prior: Code 1881 s 1382; 1863 p 218 s 116; 1860 p 181 s 83. (ii) 1917 c 156 s 59; RRS s 1429; prior: Code 1881 s 1386; 1863 p 219 s 120; 1860 p 181 s 87.]